Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0955.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 202a. (1) An Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), an employer shall do both of the following if that employer lists racial or ethnic classifications in a writing developed or printed 90 or more days after the effective date of this section, and if that employer requests that an individual select a classification to designate his or her the individual's race or ethnicity: (a) Include in the writing the term "multiracial" as a classification, and a definition of that term that substantially provides that "multiracial" means having parents of different races. (b) Exclude from the writing the term "other" as a classification. (2) If a federal agency requires an employer to transmit information obtained from an individual pursuant to a writing described in subsection (1), but rejects the classification "multiracial", the employer shall redesignate the individuals an individual identified as multiracial by allocating those individuals the individual to racial or ethnic classifications approved by the federal agency in the same ratio that those classifications occur within the general population of the group from which the information was solicited. (3) This section does not apply to an employer that is a public body as that term is defined in section 3 of the Michigan data collection act. (4) (3) As used in this section, "writing" means that term as defined in section 2 of the freedom of information act, Act No. 1976 PA 442, of the Public Acts of 1976, being section MCL 15.232. of the Michigan Compiled Laws. Sec. 402a. (1) An Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), an educational institution shall do both of the following if that educational institution lists racial or ethnic classifications in a writing developed or printed 90 or more days after the effective date of this section, and if that educational institution requests that an individual select 1 of those classifications to designate his or her the individual's race or ethnicity: (a) Include in the writing the term "multiracial" as a classification, and a definition of that term that substantially provides that "multiracial" means having parents of different races. (b) Exclude from the writing the term "other" as a classification. (2) If a federal agency requires an educational institution to transmit information obtained from an individual pursuant to a writing described in subsection (1), but rejects the classification "multiracial", the educational institution shall redesignate the individuals an individual identified as multiracial by allocating those individuals the individual to racial or ethnic classifications approved by the federal agency in the same ratio that those classifications occur within the general population of the group from which the information was solicited. (3) This section does not apply to an educational institution that is a public body or state public university as those terms are defined in section 3 of the Michigan data collection act. (4) (3) As used in this section, "writing" means that term as defined in section 2 of the freedom of information act, Act No. 1976 PA 442, of the Public Acts of 1976, being section MCL 15.232. of the Michigan Compiled Laws. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01234'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H01234'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.